src/dictionaries/lv_LV.dic
Antis/Pjuw
Armands/Oit»
Centis/Pjuw
Dzidris/Pjuw
Edijs/Oit»
Fridolins/Oit»
Gunis/Pjuw
Gunvaris/Pjuw
Hermanis/Pjuw
Igors/Oit»
Kaups/Oit»
Magnuss/Oit»
Meldris/Pjuw
Ojārs/Oit»
Rolands/Oit»
Salvis/Pjuw
Skaidris/Pjuw
Spulģis/Pjuw
Vladislavs/Oit»
administrators/Oitv
adīklis/wjPu
aizdegt/J+BdI(Mah8}4[
aizgavēnis/P
aizgruvums/itO
aiznākt/MIa+(B8h5J
aizsargstienis/Pjwu
aizķengāt/J+{$)GI1gBdbMH[
aizļumt/7^+(BhIeJZM48
akordeons/Oitv
apakšgals/Oitv
apartaments/Oi
apaugt/+IMhJa(8B4
apbalvotājs/Oi
apbirdināt/+gbd(c[MBIhC1J
apdegt/+dBM48ha(JI[}
apmetnis/uwjP
apripināt/+(bdhBI1cCJ[gM
apsniegt/+(h8
apspalvojums/Oi
apsīkums/Oitv
aptetovēt/G[+)gb$IHBM{d1J
arhivārs/Oi
arodlīderis/Pj
ataugt/+IM4B8J(ah
atdzīt/a+IJ[Bd4M
atmaigums/Oi
atminēt/+chgJdbBI1[M(C
atnākt/(+M8hBIaJ5
atstudēt/Bd+)bI{gH$M[G1
austrums/Oi
aziāts/Oi
aģents/Oitv
balansieris/jP
balsināt/[+M(hcCJgBdbI1
baltrocis/wuPj
baseins/Oitv
bauslis/wPju
bortmehāniķis/Pj
bruņutransportieris/Pj
brāļadēls/Oitv
buss/Oitv
bārabērns/Oi
bāris/Pj
būcenis/juwP
būviecirknis/jP
centralizēt/b+)dBg[J${IGH1M
cept/e(+IB4d}hJ[M8
cietpauris/jP
citāts/Oitv
daudzstūris/Pj
daudzums/Oitv
depozītnoguldījums/Oi
diabētiķis/Pj
dilūvijs/Oi
dublieris/jP
dzejolis/ujPw
dzinulis/Pj
dzītars/Oitv
dīdžejs/Oi
elektrokabelis/Pj
fabricēt/BIG+$HMgbd{)J[1
fantazētājs/Oi
firziķis/Pj
galalietotājs/Oi
gangsteris/Pj
godāt/+GBIMd)b$[{gHJ1
grauds/Oitv
greizacis/Pj
grēks/Oitv
gulbis/jwuP
hakeris/Pjuw
hans/Oi
hromoplasts/Oi
iekairināt/cC+IJgdhB1(Mb
ieklukstēt/BIg1+MdbcJC[
ieliktenis/Pj
ienest/h+eIJ(84F}M[
iesmeļošs/oi+
iestudētājs/Oi
iesvelmēt/M+b)[$Bdg1IJGH
iesēdēt/+b1BIhg[dMJ
izbuksēt/b+$)JdBI1g[GHM
izcept/}(+[hIB8eJd4M
izdragāt/I+bJG)dgB$[1{MH
izgrūžošs/io+
izlēkāt/{H+$bg)1BI[dJGM
iznirelis/jP
iznākums/Oitv
izplatinēt/+JMdI$b)gHGB1
izplūdums/Oi
izstrādāt/+[J$dbHg)GIBM{1
izzibsnīt/($)gd+bIGMHB1
izķept/I+heMJB(84
izšķinošs/+oi
kadiķis/wuPj
kakts/Oitv
kaplis/Pjwu
katetrs/Oi
kaļķītis/jP
klausīt/+bdB[I(cghJM1C
klijāns/Oi
kliņķis/wuPj
kods/Oitv
kremlis/Pj
kreppapīrs/Oi
krusttēvs/Oi
krējums/itO
kucēns/Oitv
kukainis/Pjuw
kustonis/uPwj
lavēt/${BIG)+bdJMg1H[
liedags/Oitv
lietussargs/Oitv
lombards/Oi
lākturis/Pjwu
līcis/Pwuj
līdējs/itOv
maks/Oitv
matēt/${BI+GHg)b[J1Md
mednis/Pj
mitrinātājs/Oi
mutulis/Pjwu
mārks/Oitv
mērķis/Pwju
mūlāps/Oi
neirits/Oi
nenest/(}eI8
nepārskaitlis/jP
noapaļojums/Oitv
nocementēt/+J[)Gb$MgHIdB1
nodzeltēt/I+Bdb$)MHJg1G
nokalējs/Oi
nokārstīt/IJb+Bd1g([McC
nolēnināt/+dcbhIgJCM(B1
nomērījamāks/+oi
noplūkt/IB5%+M8Ja6d[
noslīcināt/+b[JMBdIcgC(h1
nosmalcināt/dB+ghcI(Cb1MJ
noķept/I+dehJ8(B4M
noķēzīt/{H+)IG1gBdMJb$[
nārstot/+$GbJd)IBgH{1M[
nīlzirgs/Oitv
optants/Oi
paaugt/+Ia}4B[J(h8dM
pakaldināt/McJ+ChB(Ib[dg1
palauzīt/Ig1+(bcJ[M
paliekt/+%haI5B8(6dJ}M[
palievenis/Pj
pants/Oitv
papildaprīkojums/Oi
parekomendēt/+Gg$b)J[HdIM1B
pasniegums/Oi
pasutināt/+bBd[(hIcJgCM1
patupt/^+(ZdIheJB7M[84
paugurs/Oitv
pauris/Puwj
pavājēt/$H+)bgGdBIJ1M
pestelis/jP
piefiksēt/dIb+GBg)1$JHM
pienest/}e+I(Jh8F[4M
piestrebjams/+oiO
pietecināt/+IbJ(BchC1d[gM
pievads/Oitv
pieveltnēt/GI+b$g[)dJHB1M
pievijamāks/+io
poķis/jP
prauls/Oitv
proletariāts/Oi
puisēns/Oitv
puteklis/wjPu
puķupods/Oitv
puķuzirnis/Pjuw
pārcept/eh+dBJI}(8M[4
pārdrapēt/+)Gd$bgJBIH1M
pārmēdīt/Ihc+b(MgJd[1BC
pārorganizētājs/Oi
pārpatinēt/+dJ[HBI1gM$)bG
pārtēriņš/Oi
pārģipsēt/I)+JMdb[gHGB1$
pārļumt/7^Bh+Z(IeJM48
reportieris/Pj
restorāns/Oitv
rokraksts/Oitv
runcis/jPuw
rīmējums/Oi
sabakstīt/+bg(IBhcJ[Md1C
sabēgt/+aJ(hIB84M
sagaudot/gdIB+bJ)$HGM1
sakoptāks/+i
saplāksnis/jP
sargs/Oitv
sarukšķēt/Mg1I+dB[(chJbC
sarūkt/+8BIa6[5%hdMJ
saspēlēt/$+G)bBdMJ[IHg1
segments/Oitv
sivēns/Oitv
skabūzis/Pjwu
skatiens/Oitv
slietenis/wujP
smidzinātājs/Oitv
spieķis/uwjP
spēks/Oitv
spīdeklis/uwPj
stikls/Oitv
stroķis/Pj
sākt/+(Ia8BhJ[d}M4
sēklis/jPwu
tarkšķis/jPuw
teksts/Oitv
tembrs/Oitv
traipīt/+(IBbghcdM1J[C
traucētājs/Oi
trijkājis/P
trunēt/+JcbM(gBIhdC1
tvaikonis/jPuw
uzdegt/+dB[ah}(IM48J
uzpildītājs/Oi
uzsākt/(+aId[Jh8B}4M
vadzis/jwuP
vagars/Oitv
vardulēns/Oitv
veselums/Oi
vicināt/+h[bg(BICcd1MJ
viedoklis/Pj
vimpelis/wjPu
zeltkalis/jP
zintnieks/Oitv
zvaniķis/Pj
zāģis/wPuj
zīdpapīrs/Oitv
ēnot/+)b{Md$1BIJgGH[
ķīselis/jwuP
šablons/Oitv
šamanis/Pjuw
švīts/Oitv
šķērdētājs/Oi
šķīrējtiesnesis/jP
